Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-199
Credential; disciplinary action; suspension; effect.

If suspension is imposed pursuant to section 38-196, the credential holder shall not engage in the practice of a profession during the time for which the credential is suspended. The suspension shall be for a definite period of time to be set by the director. The director may provide that the credential shall be (1) automatically reinstated upon expiration of such period, (2) reinstated if the terms and conditions as set by the director are satisfied, or (3) reinstated subject to probation or limitations or conditions upon the practice of the credential holder.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 99.